Massachusetts, session 194th, H2105.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Subsection (k) of section 36 of chapter 152 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022
Official Edition, is hereby amended by striking out the following words "fifteen thousand
dollars" and inserting in place thereof the following words:- "not to exceed a sum equal to the
average wage in the commonwealth on the date of the injury multiplied by thirty, as determined
pursuant to subsection (a) of section 29 of chapter 151A"
and by striking out the following words:- “No amount shall be payable under this section
for disfigurement that is purely scar-based, unless such disfigurement is on the face, neck, or
hands."
of 1